Utah statutes.
63B-8-103.   Use of bond proceeds for issuance and other costs.
The proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter shall be used for the purposes
described in Section 63B-8-102 and to pay all or part of any cost incident to
the issuance and sale of the bonds including, without limitation, printing,
registration and transfer costs, legal fees, trustees' fees, financial
advisors' fees, and underwriters' discounts.
